Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1853YH (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. 727 Section 1. Section 537.2201, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The finance charge, calculated according to the 3 actuarial method, may not exceed twenty-one ten percent per 4 year on the unpaid balances of the amount financed. 5 Sec. 2. Section 537.2202, subsection 2, unnumbered 6 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 For each billing cycle, a charge may be made which is a 8 percentage of an amount not exceeding the greatest of the 9 following , but in no case shall exceed ten percent per year on 10 the unpaid balance of the amount financed : 11